Washington statutes.
RCW 4.68.060

Trial.

The issue formed may be tried as in other cases, but when the defendant denies in his or her answer any liability on the obligation upon which the judgment was rendered, if a verdict be found against him or her, it must not exceed the amount remaining unsatisfied on such original judgment, with interest thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 118; Code 1881 s 319; 1877 p 65 s 323; RRS s 441.]